Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-409
Electric companies; rate regulations; violation; penalty.

Any person, firm or corporation, their employees, agents or servants, who shall violate any of the provisions of sections 70-407 and 70-408 shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1933, c. 60, § 4, p. 292;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-508;

R.S.1943, § 70-409;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 136.

The railway commission does not have power to inflict the penalties provided for in this section. Miller v. Iowa-Nebraska Light & Power Co., 129 Neb. 757, 262 N.W. 855 (1935).